New York, session 2025-2026, S6463.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 72-d 2 to read as follows: 3 § 72-d. Pregnant and postpartum incarcerated individuals. 1. The 4 commissioner may authorize the transfer to a residential treatment 5 facility established under section seventy-three of this article: 6 (a) for up to one year of postpartum, an incarcerated individual who 7 gave birth within eight months of the date of commitment to a correc- 8 tional facility; and 9 (b) for the duration of the pregnancy and up to one year postpartum, 10 an incarcerated individual who is pregnant. 11 2. The commissioner may conditionally transfer an incarcerated indi- 12 vidual under subdivision one of this section to a residential treatment 13 facility for the purpose of participation in prenatal or postnatal care 14 programming and to promote bonding between the child and birthing parent 15 in addition to other programming as established by the commissioner, 16 including but not limited to evidence-based parenting skills program- 17 ming; working at paid employment; seeking employment; or participating 18 in vocational training, an education program, or chemical dependency or 19 mental health treatment services. 20 3. The commissioner shall develop policy and criteria and promulgate 21 any rules and/or regulations necessary to implement this section accord- 22 ing to public safety and generally accepted correctional practice. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03858-01-5 S. 6463 2 1 4. On or before the first of April each year, the commissioner shall 2 report to the temporary president of the senate and the speaker of the 3 assembly on the number of incarcerated individuals transferred to resi- 4 dential treatment facilities pursuant to this section and the duration 5 of such transfers for the prior calendar year. 6 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 73 of the correction law, as amended by 7 chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 8 1. The commissioner may transfer any incarcerated individual of a 9 correctional facility who is eligible for community supervision or who 10 will become eligible for community supervision within six months after 11 the date of transfer [or], who has one year or less remaining to be 12 served under [his or her] such incarcerated individual's sentence, or 13 who is a pregnant or postpartum incarcerated individual authorized under 14 section seventy-two-d of this article to a residential treatment facili- 15 ty and such person may be allowed to go outside the facility during 16 reasonable and necessary hours to engage in any activity reasonably 17 related to [his or her] such person's rehabilitation and in accordance 18 with the program established for [him or her] such person. While outside 19 the facility [he or she] such person shall be at all times in the custo- 20 dy of the department and under its supervision. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.